West Virginia, session 2026, HB4459.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: CHAPTER 19. AGRICULTURE. ARTICLE 12F. SELECT PLANT-BASED DERIVATIVES REGULATION ACT: KRATOM. §19-12F-1. Short title. Findings. [Repealed.] §19-12F-2.  Findings; purpose. [Repealed.] §19-12F-3. Definitions. [Repealed.] §19-12F-4. Processor and retailer permits; regulations; permitting; and registration. [Repealed.] §19-12F-5. Rule-making authority. [Repealed.] §19-12F-6. Age verification requirements. [Repealed.] §19-12F-7. Taxation; disposition of funds. [Repealed.] §19-12F-8. Application and registration fees. [Repealed.] §19-12F-9. Cooperative enforcement agreements. [Repealed.] §19-12F-9a. Mandatory labeling. [Repealed.] §19-12F-10. Contraband; seizures; forfeitures; and destruction. [Repealed.] §19-12F-11. Criminal violations; penalties. [Repealed.] CHAPTER 60. STATE CONTROL OF ALCOHOLIC LIQUORS. ARTICLE 10. ENFORCEMENT AUTHORITY RELATING TO RETAIL SALE OF SELECT PLANT-BASED DERIVATIVES. §60-10-1. Enforcement authority; jurisdiction. The commissioner is hereby authorized to enforce the provisions of §19-12E-1 et seq. of this code and §19-12F-1 et seq. of this code, as relating to retail sales. §60-10-2. General provisions. For the purposes of enforcing §19-12E-1 et seq. and §19-12F-1 et seq. of this code, the Alcohol Beverage Control Commission and the Commissioner of Agriculture may request information from any state agency, Constitutional officer, or local agency and, notwithstanding the provisions of §11-10-5d of this code or any other provision of this code, may share information with, and request information from, any federal agency and any agency or Constitutional officer of this or of any other state or any local agency thereof. CHAPTER 60A. UNIFORM CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES ACT. ARTICLE 2. STANDARDS AND SCHEDULES. §60A-2-204. Schedule I. (a) Schedule I shall consist of the drugs and other substances, by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical name, or brand name designated, listed in this section including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of such isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation.(b) Opiates.Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl(N-[1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-phenylacetamide);Acetylmethadol;Allylprodine;Alphacetylmethadol (except levoalphacetylmethadol also known as levo-alpha-acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, or LAAM); Alphameprodine; Alphamethadol; Alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(alpha-methyl-beta-phenyl) ethyl-4-piperidyl] propionanilide; 1-(1-methyl-2-phenylethyl)-4-(( propanilido) piperidine); Alpha-methylthiofentanyl (N-[1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-phenylpropanamide); Benzethidine; Betacetylmethadol; Beta-hydroxyfentanyl(N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide); Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl (other name: N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide); Betameprodine; Betamethadol; Betaprodine;Brorphine (1-(1-(1-(4-bromophenyl)ethyl)piperidin-4-yl)-1,3-dihydro-2H-benzo[d]imidazol-2-one); Clonitazene; Dextromoramide; Diampromide; Diethylthiambutene; Difenoxin; Dimenoxadol; Dimepheptanol; Dimethylthiambutene; Dioxaphetyl butyrate; Dipipanone; Ethylmethylthiambutene; Etonitazene; Etoxeridine; Fentanyl analog or derivative, as that term is defined in article one of this chapter: Provided, That fentanyl and carfentanil remains a Schedule II substance, as set forth in W. Va. Code §60A-2-206; Furethidine;7-Hydroxymitragynine; Hydroxypethidine; Ketobemidone; Levomoramide; Levophenacylmorphan; 3-Methylfentanyl (N-[3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide); 3-methylthiofentanyl (N-[3-methyl-1-(2-thienyl) ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-phenylpropanamide); Mitragyna speciosa; Mitragynine pseudoindoxyl; Morpheridine; N-Methylnorfentanyl (N-(1-Methyl-4-piperidinyl)-N-phenyl-propanamide, monohydrochloride);  MPPP (1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine); Noracymethadol; Norlevorphanol; Normethadone; Norpipanone; Para-fluorofentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl] propanamide); PEPAP(1-(-2-phenethyl)-4-phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine); Phenadoxone; Phenampromide; Phenomorphan; Phenoperidine; Piritramide; Proheptazine; Properidine; Propiram; Racemoramide; Synthetic alkaloid, or any other synthetically derived compound, of the plant Mitragyna speciosa, including synthetic mitragynine, synthetic 7-hydroxymitragyninie, and synthetic mitragynine pseudoindoxyl; Thiofentanyl (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-propanamide); Tilidine; Trimeperidine. (c) Opium derivatives, Acetorphine; Acetyldihydrocodeine; Benzylmorphine; Codeine methylbromide; Codeine-N-Oxide; Cyprenorphine; Desomorphine; Dihydromorphine; Drotebanol; Etorphine (except HCl Salt); Heroin; Hydromorphinol; Methyldesorphine; Methyldihydromorphine; Morphine methylbromide; Morphine methylsulfonate; Morphine-N-Oxide; Myrophine; Nicocodeine; Nicomorphine; Normorphine; Pholcodine; Thebacon. (d) Hallucinogenic substances. Alpha-ethyltryptamine; some trade or other names: etryptamine; Monase; alpha-ethy-1H-indole-3-ethanamine; 3-(2- aminobutyl) indole; alpha-ET; and AET;1-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-methylpropan-2-amine (other names: para-methoxymethamphetamine, PMMA);4-bromo-2, 5-dimethoxy-amphetamine; some trade or other names: 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-alpha-methylphenethylamine; 4-bromo- 2,5-DMA; 4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine; some trade or other names: 2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-1-aminoethane; alpha- desmethyl DOB; 2C-B, Nexus; N-(2-Methoxybenzyl)-4-bromo-2, 5-dimethoxyphenethylamine. The substance has the acronym 25B-NBOMe; 2-(4-chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl) ethanamine (25C-NBOMe); 2-(4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl) ethanamine (25I-NBOMe); 2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine; some trade or other names: 2,5-dimethoxy-alpha-methylphenethylamine; 2,5-DMA; 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylamphet-amine; some trade or other names: DOET; 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthiophenethylamine (other name: 2C-T-7); 4-methoxyamphetamine; some trade or other names: 4-methoxy-alpha-methylphenethylamine; paramethoxyamphetamine; PMA; 3-Hydoxy-phencyclidine (other name hydroxy PCP); 5-methoxy-3, 4-methylenedioxy-amphetamine; 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine; some trade and other names: 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-alpha-methylphenethylamine; "DOM"; and "STP"; 3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine; 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA); 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine (also known as ( ethyl-alpha-methyl-3,4 (methylenedioxy) phenethylamine, N-ethyl MDA, MDE, MDEA); N-hydroxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine (also known as ( hydroxy-alpha-methyl-3,4 (methylenedioxy) phenethylamine, and ( hydroxy MDA); 3,4,5-trimethoxy amphetamine; 5-methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine (5-MeO-DMT); Alpha-methyltryptamine (other name: AMT); Bufotenine; some trade and other names: 3-(beta-Dimethylaminoethyl)-5-hydroxyindole;3-(2-dimethylaminoethyl) -5-indolol; N, N-dimethylserotonin; 5-hydroxy-N,N- dimethyltryptamine; mappine; Diethyltryptamine; sometrade and other names: N, N-Diethyltryptamine; DET; Dimethyltryptamine; some trade or other names: DMT; 5-Methoxy-N,N-disopropyltryptamine (5-MeO-DIPT); Ibogaine; some trade and other names: 7-Ethyl-6, 6 Beta, 7, 8, 9, 10, 12, 13-octahydro-2-methoxy-6, 9-methano-5H- pyrido [1’, 2’: 1, 2] azepino [5,4-b] indole; Tabernanthe iboga; Lysergic acid diethylamide; Marihuana; Marijuana (Cannabis, sp.); Mescaline; Parahexyl-7374; some trade or other names: 3-Hexyl -1-hydroxy-7, 8, 9, 10-tetrahydro-6, 6, 9-trimethyl-6H-dibenzo [b,d] pyran; Synhexyl; Peyote; meaning all parts of the plant presently classified botanically as Lophophora williamsii Lemaire, whether growing or not, the seeds thereof, any extract from any part of such plant, and every compound, manufacture, salts, immediate derivative, mixture, or preparation of such plant, its seeds or extracts; N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate; N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate; Psilocybin; Psilocyn; Tetrahydrocannabinols; synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the plant, or in the resinous extractives of Cannabis, sp. and/or synthetic substances, immediate derivatives and their isomers with similar chemical structure and pharmacological activity including, but not limited to the following: delta-1 Cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers; delta-6 Cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers; delta-3,4 Cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical isomers; delta-8 Cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and its optical isomers; and delta-10 Cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and its optical isomers; (Since nomenclature of these substances is not internationally standardized, compounds of these structures, regardless of numerical designation of atomic positions covered.) Delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol-O (delta-8-THC-0), Delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol (delta-9-THC-0) and Synthetic and non-naturally occurring cannabinoids. The provisions of this section related to tetrahydrocannabinols are inapplicable to products or substances lawfully manufactured, distributed, or possessed under the provisions of § 19-12E-1 et seq. and Chapter 16H of this code. Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine; some trade or other names: N-ethyl-1-phenylcyclohexylamine, (1-phenylcyclohexyl) ethylamine, N-(1-phenylcyclohexyl) ethylamine, cyclohexamine, PCE; Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine; some trade or other names: 1-(1-phenylcyclohexyl)-pyrrolidine, PCPy, PHP; Thiophene analog of phencyclidine; some trade or other names: 1-[1-(2-thienyl)-cyclohexyl]-piperidine, 2-thienylanalog of phencyclidine; TPCP, TCP; 1[1-(2-thienyl)cyclohexyl]pyrroldine; some other names: TCPy; 4-methylmethcathinone (Mephedrone); 3,4-methylenedioxypyrovalerone (MDPV); 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-ethylphenyl)ethanamine (2C-E); 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-methylphenyl)ethanamine (2C-D); 2-(4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (2C-C); 2-(4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (2C-I); 2-[4-(Ethylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl]ethanamine (2C-T-2); 2-[4-(Isopropylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl]ethanamine (2C-T-4); 2-(2,5-Dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (2C-H); 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-nitro-phenyl)ethanamine (2C-N); 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylphenyl)ethanamine (2C-P); 3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-methylcathinone (Methylone); 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propyltghiophenethylamine (2C-T-7, itsoptical isomers, salts and salts of isomers; 5-methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine some trade or other names: 5-methoxy-3-[2-(dimethylamino)ethyl]indole; 5-MeO-DMT(5-MeO-DMT); Alpha-methyltryptamine (other name: AMT); 5-methoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine (other name: 5-MeO-DIPT); Synthetic Cannabinoids as follows: 2-[(1R,3S)-3-hydroxycyclohexyl]-5-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)phenol) { also known as CP 47,497 and homologues} ; rel-2-[(1S,3R)-3-hydroxycyclohexyl] -5-(2-methylnonan-2-yl)phenol { also known as CP 47,497-C8 homolog} ; [(6aR)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6, 6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a, 7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol)] { also known as HU-210} ; (dexanabinol); (6aS,10aS)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzol[c]chromen-1-ol) { also known as HU-211} ; 1-Pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole { also known as JWH-018} ; 1-Butyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole { also known as JWH-073} ; (2-methyl-1-propyl-1H-indol-3-yl)-1-napthalenyl-methanone { also known as JWH-015} ; (1-hexyl-1H-indol-3-yl)-1-naphthalenyl-methanone { also known as JWH-019} ; [1-[2-(4-morpholinyl) ethyl] -1H-indol-3-yl]-1-naphthalenyl-methanone { also known as JWH-200} ; 1-(1-pentyl-1H-indol-3-yl)-2-(3-hydroxyphenyl)-ethanone { also known as JWH-250} ; 2-((1S,2S,5S)-5-hydroxy-2-(3-hydroxtpropyl)cyclohexyl) -5-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)phenol { also known as CP 55,940} ; (4-methyl-1-naphthalenyl) (1-pentyl-1H-indol-3-yl)-methanone { also known as JWH-122};(4-methyl-1-naphthalenyl) (1-pentyl-1H-indol-3-yl)-methanone { also known as JWH-398;(4-methoxyphenyl)(1-pentyl-1H-indol-3-yl)methanone { also known as RCS-4} ;1-(1-(2-cyclohexylethyl) -1H-indol-3-yl) -2-(2-methoxyphenyl) ethanone { also known as RCS-8} ;1-pentyl-3-[1-(4-methoxynaphthoyl)]indole (JWH-081);1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (AM2201); and1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole (AM694).Synthetic cannabinoids:CP 47,497 AND homologues, 2-[(1R,3S)-3-Hydroxycyclohexyl]-5-(2-methyloctan-2-YL)phenol);HU-210, [(6AR,10AR)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-Methyloctan-2-YL)-6A,7,10, 10A-tetrahydrobenzo[C] chromen-1-OL)];HU-211, (dexanabinol, (6AS,10AS)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-Dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-YL)-6A,7,10,10atetrahydrobenzo[ C]chromen-1-OL);JWH-018, 1-pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;JWH-019, 1-hexyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;JWH-073, 1-butyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;JWH-200, (1-(2-morpholin-4-ylethyl)indol-3-yl)- Naphthalen-1-ylmethanone;JWH-250, 1-pentyl-3-(2-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole.]Methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate (5F-ADB);Methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoate (5F-AMB);Methyl 2-(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoate (FUB-AMB);N-(adamantan-1-yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide (5F-APINACA);N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide (ADB-FUBINACA);Methyl 2-(1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate (MDMB-CHMICA);Methyl 2-(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate (MDMB-FUBINACA);Tetrahydrocannabinols:DELTA-1 CIS OR trans tetrahydrocannabinol and their Optical isomers.DELTA-6 CIS OR trans tetrahydrocannabinol and their optical isomers.DELTA-3,4 CIS or their trans tetrahydrocannabinol and their optical isomers.Synthetic Phenethylamines2-(4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine (25I-NBOMe/ 2C-I-NBOMe);2-(4-chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine (25C-NBOMe/2C-C-NBOMe);2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine (25B-NBOMe/ 2C-B-NBOMe);Synthetic Opioids (including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts and salts of isomers, esters and ethers):N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide (acetyl fentanyl);furanyl fentanyl;3,4-dichloro-N-[2-(dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-methylbenzamide (also known as U-47700);N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbutyramide, also known as N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbutanamide, (butyryl fentanyl);N-[1-[2-hydroxy-2-(thiophen-2-yl)ethylpiperidin-4-yl]-N-phenylpropionamide, also known as N-[1-[2-hydroxy-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl]-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide, (beta-hydroxythiofentanyl);N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacrylamide (acryl fentanyl);N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylisobutyramide (isobutyryl fentanyl);N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcyclopentanecarboxamide (cyclopropyl fentanyl);2-(2,4-dichlorophenyl)-N-((1S,2S)-2-(dimethylamino)cyclohexyl)-N-methylacetamide (also known as U-48800);Trans-3,4-dichloro-N-[2-(diethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-methyl-benzamide (also known as U-49900);Trans-3,4-dichloro-N-[2-(dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-methyl-benzeneacetamide (also known as U-51754);2-(2-(4-butoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)-N,N-diethylethan-1-amine (butonitazene);2-(2-(4-ethoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)-N,N-diethylethan-1-amine (etodesnitazene); N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-fluorobenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine (flunitazene); N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-methoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine (metodesnitazene); N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-methoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine (metonitaze); 2-(4-ethoxybenzyl)5-nitro-1-(2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)ethyl)-1 H-benzimidazole (N-pyrrolidino etonitazene, etonitazepyne); N,N-diethyl-2-(5-nitro-2-(4-propoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine (protonitazene);N-pyrrolidino etonitazene;Etodesnitazene;Isotonitazene;Protonitazene;Metonitazene;Butonitazene;Metodesnitazene;Flunitazene;Opioid Receptor Agonist2-Methyl AP-237 (1-(2-methyl-4-(3-phenylprop-2-en-1-yl)piperazin-1-yl)butan-1-one)AH-7921 (3,4-dichloro-N-(1dimethylamino)cyclohexylmethyl]benzamide).Naphthoylindoles or any compound containing a 3-(-1-Napthoyl) indole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. This shall include the following:JWH 015;JWH 018;JWH 019;JWH 073;JWH 081;JWH 122;JWH 200;JWH 210;JWH 398;AM 2201; andWIN 55,212.Naphylmethylindoles or any compound containing a 1hindol-3-yl-(1-naphthyl) methane structure with a substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. This shall include, but not be limited to, JWH 175 and JWH 184.Naphthoylpyrroles or any compound containing a 3-(1- Naphthoyl) pyrrole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the pyrrole ring whether or not further substituted in the pyrrole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. This shall include, but not be limited to, JWH 147 and JWH 307.Naphthylmethylindenes or any compound containing a Naphthylideneindene structure with substitution at the 3- Position of the indene ring whether or not further substituted in the indene ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. This shall include, but not be limited to, JWH 176.Phenylacetylindoles or any compound containing a 3- Phenylacetylindole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent. This shall include the following:RCS-8, SR-18 OR BTM-8;JWH 250;JWH 203;JWH 251; andJWH 302.Cyclohexylphenols or any compound containing a 2-(3-hydroxycyclohexyl) phenol structure with a substitution at the 5-position of the phenolic ring whether or not substituted in the cyclohexyl ring to any extent. This shall include the following:CP 47,497 and its homologues and analogs;Cannabicyclohexanol; andCP 55,940.Benzoylindoles or any compound containing a 3-(benzoyl) indole structure with substitution at the nitrogren atom of the indole ring whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent. This shall include the following:AM 694;Pravadoline WIN 48,098;RCS 4; andAM 679.[2,3-dihydro-5 methyl-3-(4-morpholinylmethyl)pyrrolo [1,2,3-DE]-1, 4-benzoxazin-6-YL]-1-napthalenymethanone. This shall include WIN 55,212-2.Dibenzopyrans or any compound containing a 11-hydroxydelta 8-tetrahydrocannabinol structure with substitution on the 3-pentyl group. This shall include HU-210, HU-211, JWH 051, and JWH 133.Adamantoylindoles or any compound containing a 3-(-1-Adamantoyl) indole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring whether or not further substituted in the adamantoyl ring system to any extent. This shall include AM1248.Tetramethylcyclopropylindoles or any compound containing A 3-tetramethylcyclopropylindole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the tetramethylcyclopropyl ring to any extent. This shall include UR-144 and XLR-11.N-(1-Adamantyl)-1-pentyl-1h-indazole-3-carboxamide. This shall include AKB48.Any other synthetic chemical compound that is a Cannabinoid receptor type 1 agonist as demonstrated by binding studies and functional assays that is not listed in Schedules II, III, IV, and V, not federal Food and Drug Administration approved drug or used within legitimate, approved medical research. Since nomenclature of these substances is not internationally standardized, any immediate precursor or immediate derivative of these substances shall be covered.Tryptamines:5-methoxy-N-methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine (5-MeO-MiPT);4-hydroxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine (4-HO-DiPT);4-hydroxy-N-methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine (4-HO-MiPT);4-hydroxy-N-methyl-N-ethyltryptamine (4-HO-MET);4-acetoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine (4-AcO-DiPT);5-methoxy-α-methyltryptamine (5-MeO-AMT);4-methoxy-N,N-Dimethyltryptamine (4-MeO-DMT);4-hydroxy Diethyltryptamine (4-HO-DET);5-methoxy-N,N-diallyltryptamine (5-MeO-DALT);4-acetoxy-N,N-Dimethyltryptamine (4-AcO DMT);4-hydroxy Diethyltryptamine (4-HO-DET);FDU-PB-22 (1-Naphthyl 1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylate);FUB-PB-22 (Quinolin-8-yl 1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylate);5-Fluoro-MN-24 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-N-(naphthalen-1-yl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamide);MN-24 (N-(naphthalen-1-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxamide);SDB-005 (Naphthalen-1-yl 1-pentyl-1H-indazole-3-carboxylate);SDB-006 (1-Pentyl-N-(phenylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamide);Methyl-Ethylaminopentiophenone;FUB-AMB (Methyl(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carbonyl)-L-valinate);5-Fluoro-SDB-005 Indole (Naphthalen-1-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylate);5F-AB-PINACA (N-(1-Amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide);MMB-CHMICA (Methyl 2-(1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoat);MN-24 (N-(naphthalen-1-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxamide);SDB-005 (Naphthalen-1-yl 1-pentyl-1H-indazole-3-carboxylate);SDB-006 (1-Pentyl-N-(phenylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamide);Ethcathinone (2-(ethylamino)-1-phenyl-1-propanone, monohydrochloride);Methyl-Ethylaminopentiophenone;FUB-AMB (Methyl(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carbonyl)-L-valinate);5-Fluoro-SDB-005 Indole (Naphthalen-1-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylate);5F-AB-PINACA (N-(1-Amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide);MMB-CHMICA (Methyl 2-(1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoat);Bromazolam (8-bromo-1-methyl-6-phenyl-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine);Clonazolam (6-(2-chlorophenyl)-1-methyl-8-nitro-4 H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine);Cloniprazepam (5-(2-chlorophenyl)-1-(cyclopropylmethyl)-1,3-dihydro-7-nitro-2H-1,4-benzodiazepin-2-one);Etizolam (4-(2-chlorophenyl)-2-ethyl-9-methyl-6H-thieno[3,2-f] [1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]diazepine);Flualprazolam (8-chloro-6-(2-fluorophenyl)-1-methyl-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine);Flubromazepam (7-bromo-5-(2-fluorophenyl)-1,3-dihydro-2H-1,4-benzodiazepin-2-one);Flubromazolam (8-bromo-6-(2-fluorophenyl)-1-methyl-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine);Flunitrazolam (6-(2-fluorophenyl)-1-methyl-8-nitro-4H-benzo[f][1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]diazepine);Nifoxipam (5-(2-fluorophenyl)-1,3-dihydro-3-hydroxy-7-nitro-2H-1,4-benzodiazepin-2-one) ;Nitrazolam (1-methyl-8-nitro-6-phenyl-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine); andPyrazolam (8-bromo-1-methyl-6-(2-pyridinyl)-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine).(e) Depressants.4-CN-CUMYL-BUTINACA (1-(4-Cyanobutyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide);Alpha-Phenylacetoacetonitrile (3-Oxo-2-phenylbutanenitrile);2-Fluoro Deschloroketamine (2-(2-Fluorophenyl)-2-(methylamino)-cyclohexanone, monohydrochloride);4-MEAP (2-(Ethylamino)-1-(4-methylphenyl)pentan-1-one);Mecloqualone;Methaqualone;Bromazolam (8-bromo-1-methyl-6-phenyl-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine);Clonazolam (6-(2-chlorophenyl)-1-methyl-8-nitro-4 H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3 a][1,4]benzodiazepine);Cloniprazepam (5-(2-chlorophenyl)-1-(cyclopropylmethyl)-1,3-dihydro-7-nitro-2H-1,4-benzodiazepin-2-one);Etizolam (4-(2-chlorophenyl)-2-ethyl-9-methyl-6H-thieno[3,2-f] [1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]diazepine);Flualprazolam (8-chloro-6-(2-fluorophenyl)-1-methyl-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine);Flubromazepam (7-bromo-5-(2-fluorophenyl)-1,3-dihydro-2H-1,4-benzodiazepin-2-one);Flubromazolam (8-bromo-6-(2-fluorophenyl)-1-methyl-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine);Flunitrazolam (6-(2-fluorophenyl)-1-methyl-8-nitro-4H-benzo[f][1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]diazepine);gamma-hydroxybutyric acid (some other names include GHB; gamma-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hydroxybutanoic acid; sodium oxybate; sodium oxybutyrate);Nifoxipam (5-(2-fluorophenyl)-1,3-dihydro-3-hydroxy-7-nitro-2H-1,4-benzodiazepin-2-one);Nitrazolam (1-methyl-8-nitro-6-phenyl-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine);Pyrazolam (8-bromo-1-methyl-6-(2-pyridinyl)-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine);Diclazepam (7-Chloro-5-(2-chlorophenyl)-1-methyl-1,3-dihydro-2H-1,4-benzodiazepin-2-one); andDeschloroetizolam (2-Ethyl-9-methyl-4-phenyl-6H-thieno[3,2-f][1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]diazepine); (f) Stimulants. Aminorex; some other names: aminoxaphen; 2-amino-5- phenyl-2-oxazoline; or 4,5-dihydro-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine;4,4'-Dimethylaminorex (4,4′-DMAR; 4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-5-(4-methylphenyl)-2-oxazolamine; 4-methyl-5-(4-methylphenyl)-4,5-dihydro-1,3-oxazol-2-amine); Cathinone; some trade or other names: 2-amino-1-phenyl-1-propanone, alpha-aminopropiophenone, 2-aminopropiophenone and norephedrone;Ethylphenidate (ethyl 2-phenyl-2-(piperidin-2-yl)acetate); Fenethylline; Mesocarb (N-phenyl-N ′-(3-(1-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1,2,3-oxadiazol-3-ium-5-yl)carbamimidate); Methcathinone, its immediate precursors and immediate derivatives, its salts, optical isomers and salts of optical isomers; some other names: (2-(methylamino)-propiophenone; alpha- (methylamino)propiophenone; 2-(methylamino)-1-phenylpropan-1-one; alpha-methylaminopropiophenone; monomethylpropion; 3,4-methylenedioxypyrovalerone and/or mephedrone;3,4-methylenedioxypyrovalerone (MPVD); ephedrone; N-methylcathinone; methylcathinone; AL-464; AL-422; AL-463 and UR1432; (+-) cis-4-methylaminorex; ((+-)cis-4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine); N-ethylamphetamine; N,N-dimethylamphetemine; also known as N,N-alpha-trimethyl-benzeneethanamine; N,N-alpha-trimethylphenethylamine; Alpha-pyrrolidinopentiophenone, also known as alpha-PVP, optical isomers, salts and salts of isomers;Substituted amphetamines:2-Fluoroamphetamine;3-Fluoroamphetamine;4-Fluoroamphetamine;2-chloroamphetamine;3-chloroamphetamine;4-chloroamphetamine;2-Fluoromethamphetamine;3-Fluoromethamphetamine;4-Fluoromethamphetamine;4-chloromethamphetamine;Ethcathinone (2-(ethylamino)-1-phenyl-1-propanone, monohydrochloride);Alpha-PHP (1-Phenyl-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)hexan-1-one);MPHP (1-(4-Methylphenyl)-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)hexan-1-one);PV8 (1-Phenyl-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)heptan-1-one);4-Chloro-Alpha-PVP (1-(4-chlorophenyl)-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)pentan-1-one);N-Ethylhexedrone (2-(Ethylamino)-1-phenylhexan-1-one);Methoxetamine (2-(Ethylamino)-2-(3-methoxyphenyl)-cyclohexanone); and3-Fluorophenmetrazine (2-(3-Fluorophenyl)-3-methylmorpholine);(g) Temporary listing of substances subject to emergency scheduling. Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances:N-[1-benzyl-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (benzylfentanyl), its optical isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;N-[1-(2-thienyl)methyl-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (thenylfentanyl), its optical isomers, salts, and salts of isomers.N-benzylpiperazine, also known as BZP;Cyclopentyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcyclopentanecarboxamide);4-fluorobutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)piperidin-4-yl]-butyramide);Isobutyryl fentanyl (2-methyl-N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)piperidin-4-yl]-propanamide);Methoxyacetyl fentanyl (2-methoxy-N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)piperidin-4-yl]-acetamide);3-methylbutyryl fentanyl (N-[3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)piperidin-4-yl]-N-phenylbutyramide);4-methoxybutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide);Ocfentanil (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-2-methoxy-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)piperidin-4-yl]-acetamide);Tetrahydrofuran fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenyltetrahydrofuran-2-carboxamide); andValeryl fentanyl (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)piperidin-4-yl]pentanamide).(h) The following controlled substances are included in Schedule I:Synthetic Cathinones or any compound, except bupropion or compounds listed under a different schedule, or compounds used within legitimate and approved medical research, structurally derived from 2-Aminopropan-1-one by substitution at the 1-position with Monocyclic or fused polycyclic ring systems, whether or not the compound is further modified in any of the following ways:By substitution in the ring system to any extent with Alkyl, alkylenedioxy, alkoxy, haloalkyl, hydroxyl, or halide Substituents whether or not further substituted in the ring system by one or more other univalent substituents; By substitution at the 3-position with an acyclic alkyl substituent; By substitution at the 2-amino nitrogen atom with alkyl, dialkyl, benzyl or methoxybenzyl groups; By inclusion of the 2-amino nitrogen atom in a cyclic structure; or Any other synthetic chemical compound that is a Cannabinoid receptor type 1 agonist as demonstrated by binding studies and functional assays that is not listed in Schedules II, III, IV, and V, not federal Food and Drug Administration approved drug or used within legitimate, approved medical research.